Washington statutes.
RCW 19.174.010

Intent.

The intent of the legislature in enacting this chapter is to enhance the safety of consumers using automated teller machines and night deposit facilities in Washington without discouraging the siting of automated teller machines and night deposit facilities in locations convenient to consumers' homes and workplaces. Because decisions concerning safety at automated teller machines and night deposit facilities are inherently subjective, the legislature establishes as the standard of care applicable to operators of automated teller machines and night deposit facilities, in connection with user safety, compliance with the objective standards and information requirements of this chapter. It is not the intent of the legislature in enacting this chapter to impose a duty to relocate or modify automated teller machines or night deposit facilities upon the occurrence of a particular event or circumstance, but rather to establish a means for the evaluation of all automated teller machines and night deposit facilities as provided in this chapter. The legislature further recognizes the need for uniformity as to the establishment of safety standards for automated teller machines and night deposit facilities and intends with this chapter to supersede and preempt a rule, regulation, code, or ordinance of a city, county, municipality, or local agency regarding customer safety at automated teller machines and night deposit facilities in Washington.

[ 1993 c 324 s 2.]